Hawaii statutes.
[§466K‑5] Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Arbitrator" means an individual
appointed to render an award in a controversy that is subject to an agreement
to arbitrate.

"Uniform Standards of Professional
Appraisal Practice" means the most recent iteration of the Uniform Standards
of Professional Appraisal Practice developed by the appraisal standards board
of The Appraisal Foundation and approved by the director. [L 2011, c 227, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next